Illinois, session 104th, SB2652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Responsible 5Gun Manufacturing Act.  6    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 7changing Sections 24-1 and 24-2 as follows: 8    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)9    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 10    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 11weapons when he knowingly:12        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 13    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 14    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 15    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 16    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 17    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 18    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 19    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 20    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 21    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or22        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same   SB2652- 2 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 2    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 3    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 4    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or5        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 6    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 7    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 8    used for religious worship; or 9        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 10    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 11    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 12    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 13    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 14    18 years of age or older; or15        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 16    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 17    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 18    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 19    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 20    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 21    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 22    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 23    conditions:24            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or25            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or26            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm   SB2652- 3 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 2        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 3        Owner's Identification Card; or4            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 5        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 6        been issued a currently valid license under the 7        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 8        (5) Sets a spring gun; or9        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 10    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 11    of any firearm; or12        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 13    carries:14            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 15        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 16        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 17        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 18        without manually reloading by a single function of the 19        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 20        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 21        or carries any combination of parts designed or 22        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 23        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 24        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 25        possession or under the control of a person. Machine 26        gun also includes any convertible pistol equipped with   SB2652- 4 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        a switch, as defined in paragraph (17) of this 2        subsection (a); or ;3            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 4        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 5        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 6        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 7        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 8        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 9        26 inches; or10            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 11        other container containing an explosive substance of 12        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 13        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 14        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or15        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 16    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 17    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 18    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 19    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 20    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 21    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 22    unloaded firearms is conducted.23        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 24    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 25    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 26    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or  SB2652- 5 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 2    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 3    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 4    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 5    identity; or6        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 7    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 8    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 9    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 10    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 11    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 12    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 13    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 14    another person as an invitee with that person's 15    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 16    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 17    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 18    one of the following conditions:19            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or20            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or21            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 22        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 23        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 24        Owner's Identification Card; or25            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 26        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has   SB2652- 6 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        been issued a currently valid license under the 2        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 3        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 4    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 5    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 6    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 7    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 8    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 9    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 10    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 11    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 12    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 13    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 14    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or15        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 16    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 17    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 18    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 19    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 20    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 21    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 22    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 23    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 24    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 25    the propellant contained in such tube between the 26    projectile and the cap; or  SB2652- 7 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        (12) (Blank); or2        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 3    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 4    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 5    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 6    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 7    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 8    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 9    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or10        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 11    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 12    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 13    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 14    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 15    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 16    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 17    or18        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 19    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or20        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 21    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 22    violation of Section 24-1.9; or . 23        (17) Manufactures, sells, or offers to sell, 24    purchases, receives, manufactures, imports, or transfers a 25    convertible pistol. In this paragraph (17):26        "Convertible pistol" means any semiautomatic pistol   SB2652- 8 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    with a cruciform trigger bar that can be readily converted 2    by hand or with common household tools into a machine gun 3    by the installation or attachment of a switch as a 4    replacement for the slide's backplate without any 5    additional engineering, machining, or modification of the 6    pistol's trigger mechanism. "Machine gun-convertible 7    pistol" does not include a hammer-fired semiautomatic 8    pistol or a striker-fired semiautomatic pistol that lacks 9    a cruciform trigger bar, but instead has a trigger bar 10    that is shielded from interference by a pistol converter. 11    A polymer notch or other piece of polymer molded into the 12    rear of the pistol frame does not prevent ready conversion 13    into a machine gun and will not prevent a pistol from 14    qualifying as convertible under this definition.15        "Switch" means any device or instrument that when 16    installed in or attached to the slide of a semi-automatic 17    pistol interferes with the trigger mechanism and thereby 18    enables the pistol to discharge a number of shots rapidly 19    or automatically with one continuous pull of the trigger.20        "Common household tool" means a screwdriver (8 to 10 21    inches in length, flathead or phillips, flathead sizes up 22    to 5/8 inches), pipe wrenches (9 1/2 to 10 inches in 23    length), vice grip pliers (9 1/2 to 10 inches in length), 24    other pliers (9 1/2 to 10 inches arch joint, 6 to 6 25    1/2-inch slip joint, 6 to 6 1/2-inch long nose), hacksaws 26    (12-inch standard carbon steel blade), crowbars (16-inch),   SB2652- 9 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    electric/cordless drills (1/3 horsepower corded/9.6 volt 2    cordless), hammers (16-ounce), chisels (1/4-inch to 1-inch 3    blade width wood chisels), and crescent wrenches 4    (10-inch). 5    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 6subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 7subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 8commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 9violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 10Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 11subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 1224-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 13violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) or 24-1(a)(17) commits a 14Class 2 felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 15of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the 16weapon is possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor 17vehicle as defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code, or on the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which 19case it shall be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a 20second or subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 2124-1(a)(8), 24-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits a 22Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a violation of 23subsection 24-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 24felony. The possession of each weapon or device in violation 25of this Section constitutes a single and separate violation.26    (c) Violations in specific places.  SB2652- 10 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 2    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 3    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 4    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 5    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 6    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 7    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 8    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 9    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 10    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 11    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 12    comprising any public park, on the real property 13    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 14    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 15    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 16    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 17    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 18    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 19    public transportation facility, or residential property 20    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 21    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 22    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 23    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 24    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.25        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 26    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of   SB2652- 11 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 2    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 3    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 4    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 5    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 6    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 7    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 8    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 9    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 10    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 11    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 12    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 13    students to or from school or a school related activity, 14    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 15    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 16    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 17    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 18    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 19    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 20    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 21    commits a Class 3 felony.22        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 23    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 24    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 25    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 26    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered   SB2652- 12 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 2    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 3    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 4    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 5    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 6    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 7    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 8    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 9    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 10    students to or from school or a school related activity, 11    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 12    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 13    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 14    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 15    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 16    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 17    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 18    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 19    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 20    of this State for the conduct of official business.21        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 22    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 23    security officers of such school, college, or university 24    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 25    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 26    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school   SB2652- 13 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 2    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 3    package.4        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 5    means any public or private elementary or secondary 6    school, community college, college, or university.7        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 8    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 9    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 10    persons by means available to the general public, except 11    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 12    of the general public as passengers; and "public 13    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 14    where one may obtain public transportation. 15    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 16omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 17subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 18possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 19such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 20substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 21(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 22upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 23such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 24operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 25and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 26shall not apply to the driver.  SB2652- 14 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    (e) Exemptions.2        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 3    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 4    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 5    this Section.6        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 7    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 8    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 9    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 10    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 11    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 12    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 13    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 14    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 15    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 16    switchblade knives. 17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 18103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    (720 ILCS 5/24-2)20    Sec. 24-2. Exemptions. 21    (a) Subsections 24-1(a)(3), 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(10), and 2224-1(a)(13) and Section 24-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of 23the following:24        (1) Peace officers, and any person summoned by a peace 25    officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the   SB2652- 15 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    peace, while actually engaged in assisting such officer.2        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 3    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 4    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense, 5    while in the performance of their official duty, or while 6    commuting between their homes and places of employment.7        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 8    the United States or the Illinois National Guard or the 9    Reserve Officers Training Corps, while in the performance 10    of their official duty.11        (4) Special agents employed by a railroad or a public 12    utility to perform police functions, and guards of armored 13    car companies, while actually engaged in the performance 14    of the duties of their employment or commuting between 15    their homes and places of employment; and watchmen while 16    actually engaged in the performance of the duties of their 17    employment.18        (5) Persons licensed as private security contractors, 19    private detectives, or private alarm contractors, or 20    employed by a private security contractor, private 21    detective, or private alarm contractor agency licensed by 22    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 23    if their duties include the carrying of a weapon under the 24    provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 25    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 26    2004, while actually engaged in the performance of the   SB2652- 16 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    duties of their employment or commuting between their 2    homes and places of employment. A person shall be 3    considered eligible for this exemption if he or she has 4    completed the required 20 hours of training for a private 5    security contractor, private detective, or private alarm 6    contractor, or employee of a licensed private security 7    contractor, private detective, or private alarm contractor 8    agency and 28 hours of required firearm training, and has 9    been issued a firearm control card by the Department of 10    Financial and Professional Regulation. Conditions for the 11    renewal of firearm control cards issued under the 12    provisions of this Section shall be the same as for those 13    cards issued under the provisions of the Private 14    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 15    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 16    card shall be carried by the private security contractor, 17    private detective, or private alarm contractor, or 18    employee of the licensed private security contractor, 19    private detective, or private alarm contractor agency at 20    all times when he or she is in possession of a concealable 21    weapon permitted by his or her firearm control card.22        (6) Any person regularly employed in a commercial or 23    industrial operation as a security guard for the 24    protection of persons employed and private property 25    related to such commercial or industrial operation, while 26    actually engaged in the performance of his or her duty or   SB2652- 17 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    traveling between sites or properties belonging to the 2    employer, and who, as a security guard, is a member of a 3    security force registered with the Department of Financial 4    and Professional Regulation; provided that such security 5    guard has successfully completed a course of study, 6    approved by and supervised by the Department of Financial 7    and Professional Regulation, consisting of not less than 8    48 hours of training that includes the theory of law 9    enforcement, liability for acts, and the handling of 10    weapons. A person shall be considered eligible for this 11    exemption if he or she has completed the required 20 hours 12    of training for a security officer and 28 hours of 13    required firearm training, and has been issued a firearm 14    control card by the Department of Financial and 15    Professional Regulation. Conditions for the renewal of 16    firearm control cards issued under the provisions of this 17    Section shall be the same as for those cards issued under 18    the provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 19    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 20    2004. The firearm control card shall be carried by the 21    security guard at all times when he or she is in possession 22    of a concealable weapon permitted by his or her firearm 23    control card.24        (7) Agents and investigators of the Illinois 25    Legislative Investigating Commission authorized by the 26    Commission to carry the weapons specified in subsections   SB2652- 18 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    24-1(a)(3) and 24-1(a)(4), while on duty in the course of 2    any investigation for the Commission.3        (8) Persons employed by a financial institution as a 4    security guard for the protection of other employees and 5    property related to such financial institution, while 6    actually engaged in the performance of their duties, 7    commuting between their homes and places of employment, or 8    traveling between sites or properties owned or operated by 9    such financial institution, and who, as a security guard, 10    is a member of a security force registered with the 11    Department; provided that any person so employed has 12    successfully completed a course of study, approved by and 13    supervised by the Department of Financial and Professional 14    Regulation, consisting of not less than 48 hours of 15    training which includes theory of law enforcement, 16    liability for acts, and the handling of weapons. A person 17    shall be considered to be eligible for this exemption if 18    he or she has completed the required 20 hours of training 19    for a security officer and 28 hours of required firearm 20    training, and has been issued a firearm control card by 21    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 22    Conditions for renewal of firearm control cards issued 23    under the provisions of this Section shall be the same as 24    for those issued under the provisions of the Private 25    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 26    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control   SB2652- 19 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    card shall be carried by the security guard at all times 2    when he or she is in possession of a concealable weapon 3    permitted by his or her firearm control card. For purposes 4    of this subsection, "financial institution" means a bank, 5    savings and loan association, credit union, or company 6    providing armored car services.7        (9) Any person employed by an armored car company to 8    drive an armored car, while actually engaged in the 9    performance of his duties.10        (10) Persons who have been classified as peace 11    officers pursuant to the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 12    Act.13        (11) Investigators of the Office of the State's 14    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor authorized by the board of 15    governors of the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 16    Prosecutor to carry weapons pursuant to Section 7.06 of 17    the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.18        (12) Special investigators appointed by a State's 19    Attorney under Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code.20        (12.5) Probation officers while in the performance of 21    their duties, or while commuting between their homes, 22    places of employment or specific locations that are part 23    of their assigned duties, with the consent of the chief 24    judge of the circuit for which they are employed, if they 25    have received weapons training according to requirements 26    of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm   SB2652- 20 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    Training Act.2        (13) Court security officers Security Officers while 3    in the performance of their official duties, or while 4    commuting between their homes and places of employment, 5    with the consent of the sheriff Sheriff.6        (13.5) A person employed as an armed security guard at 7    a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or 8    facility regulated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 9    who has completed the background screening and training 10    mandated by the rules and regulations of the Nuclear 11    Regulatory Commission.12        (14) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of weapons 13    to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 14    (13.5) of this subsection to possess those weapons.15    (a-5) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 16to or affect any person carrying a concealed pistol, revolver, 17or handgun and the person has been issued a currently valid 18license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act at the time of 19the commission of the offense.20    (a-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 21to or affect a qualified current or retired law enforcement 22officer or a current or retired deputy, county correctional 23officer, or correctional officer of the Department of 24Corrections qualified under the laws of this State or under 25the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act. 26    (b) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section   SB2652- 21 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b124-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of the following:2        (1) Members of any club or organization organized for 3    the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon 4    established target ranges, whether public or private, and 5    patrons of such ranges, while such members or patrons are 6    using their firearms on those target ranges.7        (2) Duly authorized military or civil organizations 8    while parading, with the special permission of the 9    Governor.10        (3) Hunters, trappers, or fishermen while engaged in 11    lawful hunting, trapping, or fishing under the provisions 12    of the Wildlife Code or the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.13        (4) Transportation of weapons that are broken down in 14    a non-functioning state or are not immediately accessible.15        (5) Carrying or possessing any pistol, revolver, stun 16    gun or taser or other firearm on the land or in the legal 17    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 18    person's permission. 19    (c) Subsection 24-1(a)(7) does not apply to or affect any 20of the following:21        (1) Peace officers while in performance of their 22    official duties.23        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 24    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 25    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.26        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of   SB2652- 22 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 2    the performance of their official duty.3        (4) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of machine 4    guns to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 5    (3) of this subsection to possess machine guns, if the 6    machine guns are broken down in a non-functioning state or 7    are not immediately accessible.8        (5) Persons licensed under federal law to manufacture 9    any weapon from which 8 or more shots or bullets can be 10    discharged by a single function of the firing device, or 11    ammunition for such weapons, and actually engaged in the 12    business of manufacturing such weapons or ammunition, but 13    only with respect to activities which are within the 14    lawful scope of such business, such as the manufacture, 15    transportation, or testing of such weapons or ammunition. 16    This exemption does not authorize the general private 17    possession of any weapon from which 8 or more shots or 18    bullets can be discharged by a single function of the 19    firing device, but only such possession and activities as 20    are within the lawful scope of a licensed manufacturing 21    business described in this paragraph.22        During transportation, such weapons shall be broken 23    down in a non-functioning state or not immediately 24    accessible.25        (6) The manufacture, transport, testing, delivery, 26    transfer, or sale, and all lawful commercial or   SB2652- 23 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    experimental activities necessary thereto, of rifles, 2    shotguns, and weapons made from rifles or shotguns, or 3    ammunition for such rifles, shotguns, or weapons, where 4    engaged in by a person operating as a contractor or 5    subcontractor pursuant to a contract or subcontract for 6    the development and supply of such rifles, shotguns, 7    weapons, or ammunition to the United States government or 8    any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, when 9    such activities are necessary and incident to fulfilling 10    the terms of such contract.11        The exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(6) 12    shall also apply to any authorized agent of any such 13    contractor or subcontractor who is operating within the 14    scope of his employment, where such activities involving 15    such weapon, weapons, or ammunition are necessary and 16    incident to fulfilling the terms of such contract.17        (7) A person possessing a rifle with a barrel or 18    barrels less than 16 inches in length if: (A) the person 19    has been issued a Curios and Relics license from the U.S. 20    Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or 21    (B) the person is an active member of a bona fide, 22    nationally recognized military re-enacting group and the 23    modification is required and necessary to accurately 24    portray the weapon for historical re-enactment purposes; 25    the re-enactor is in possession of a valid and current 26    re-enacting group membership credential; and the overall   SB2652- 24 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    length of the weapon as modified is not less than 26 2    inches.3    (d) Subsection 24-1(a)(1) does not apply to the purchase, 4possession or carrying of a black-jack or slung-shot by a 5peace officer.6    (e) Subsection 24-1(a)(8) does not apply to any owner, 7manager, or authorized employee of any place specified in that 8subsection nor to any law enforcement officer.9    (f) Subsection 24-1(a)(4) and subsection 24-1(a)(10) and 10Section 24-1.6 do not apply to members of any club or 11organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting 12at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or 13private, while using their firearms on those target ranges.14    (g) Subsections 24-1(a)(11) and 24-3.1(a)(6) do not apply 15to:16        (1) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 17    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 18    the performance of their official duty.19        (2) Bonafide collectors of antique or surplus military 20    ordnance.21        (3) Laboratories having a department of forensic 22    ballistics, or specializing in the development of 23    ammunition or explosive ordnance.24        (4) Commerce, preparation, assembly, or possession of 25    explosive bullets by manufacturers of ammunition licensed 26    by the federal government, in connection with the supply   SB2652- 25 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    of those organizations and persons exempted by subdivision 2    (g)(1) of this Section, or like organizations and persons 3    outside this State, or the transportation of explosive 4    bullets to any organization or person exempted in this 5    Section by a common carrier or by a vehicle owned or leased 6    by an exempted manufacturer.7    (g-5) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to or affect 8persons licensed under federal law to manufacture any device 9or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use 10in silencing the report of any firearm, firearms, or 11ammunition for those firearms equipped with those devices, and 12actually engaged in the business of manufacturing those 13devices, firearms, or ammunition, but only with respect to 14activities that are within the lawful scope of that business, 15such as the manufacture, transportation, or testing of those 16devices, firearms, or ammunition. This exemption does not 17authorize the general private possession of any device or 18attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 19silencing the report of any firearm, but only such possession 20and activities as are within the lawful scope of a licensed 21manufacturing business described in this subsection (g-5). 22During transportation, these devices shall be detached from 23any weapon or not immediately accessible.24    (g-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 2524-1.6 do not apply to or affect any parole agent or parole 26supervisor who meets the qualifications and conditions   SB2652- 26 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1prescribed in Section 3-14-1.5 of the Unified Code of 2Corrections. 3    (g-7) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to a peace 4officer while serving as a member of a tactical response team 5or special operations team. A peace officer may not personally 6own or apply for ownership of a device or attachment of any 7kind designed, used, or intended for use in silencing the 8report of any firearm. These devices shall be owned and 9maintained by lawfully recognized units of government whose 10duties include the investigation of criminal acts.11    (g-10) (Blank). 12    (g-11) Subsection 24-1(a)(17) does not apply to or effect 13any of the following:14        (1) Sales to or purchases by peace officers, as 15    defined in Section 2-13, for use in their official duties.16        (2) Sales to or transfers by local law enforcement 17    agencies for the purpose of equipping the agency's peace 18    officers as defined in paragraph (1).19        (3) Sales to wardens, superintendents, and keepers of 20    prisons, penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for 21    use in the detention of persons accused or convicted of an 22    offense.23        (4) Sales to or purchases by members of the Armed 24    Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or the 25    Illinois National Guard, for use in their official duties.26        (5) Any company that employs armed security officers   SB2652- 27 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    in this State at a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or 2    development site or facility regulated by the federal 3    Nuclear Regulatory Commission and any person employed as 4    an armed security force member at a nuclear energy 5    storage, weapons, or development site or facility 6    regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission who 7    has completed the background screening and training 8    mandated by the rules and regulations of the federal 9    Nuclear Regulatory Commission and for the performance of 10    official duties.11        (6) A firearm modified to render it permanently 12    inoperative.13        (7) A certified licensed firearms dealer or 14    manufacturer who is:15            (A) providing or servicing a convertible pistol 16        for a law enforcement unit or for personnel exempted 17        under paragraphs (1) through (5);18            (B) acting to sell or transfer a convertible 19        pistol to a licensed firearm dealer in another state 20        or to an individual purchaser in another state through 21        a licensed firearms dealer; or22            (C) acting to return to a customer in another 23        state a convertible pistol to the licensed firearms 24        dealer or manufacturer under the terms of a warranty 25        or for repair.26        (8) Sales, purchases, or transfers to organizations   SB2652- 28 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1    that are required or authorized by federal law governing 2    their specific business or activity to acquire convertible 3    pistols.4        (9) The receipt of a convertible pistol by 5    inheritance, and possession of the convertible pistol, if 6    the decedent lawfully possessed the convertible pistol and 7    the person inheriting the convertible pistol is not 8    otherwise disqualified from possessing a firearm under 9    federal or State law.10        (10) The receipt of a convertible pistol by a personal 11    representative of an estate for purposes of exercising the 12    powers and duties of a personal representative of an 13    estate.14        (11) Receipt of a convertible pistol by a person who 15    is retired in good standing from service with a law 16    enforcement agency of the State or a local unit in the 17    State and is not otherwise prohibited from receiving a 18    convertible pistol if:19            (A) the convertible pistol is sold or transferred 20        to the person by the law enforcement agency on 21        retirement; or22            (B) the convertible pistol was purchased or 23        obtained by the person for official use with the law 24        enforcement agency before retirement.25        (12) Transfer, receipt, and testing by, or shipping to 26    or from:  SB2652- 29 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1            (A) an ISO 17025 accredited, National Institute of 2        Justice-approved ballistics testing laboratory; or3            (B) a facility or entity that manufactures or 4        provides research and development testing, analysis, 5        or engineering for personal protective equipment or 6        vehicle protection systems.7        (13) The temporary transfer of a convertible pistol 8    that was lawfully purchased and possessed prior to the 9    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10    Assembly or otherwise lawfully obtained following the 11    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12    Assembly to a certified licensed firearms dealer or 13    gunsmith for the purpose of servicing the convertible 14    pistol or the return of the convertible pistol to its 15    lawful owner by a certified licensed firearms dealer or 16    gunsmith upon the completion of servicing the convertible 17    pistol.18        (14) The manufacture, transportation, sale, or rental 19    of blank firing convertible pistols to persons authorized 20    or permitted, or both authorized and permitted, to acquire 21    and possess these weapons or attachments for the purpose 22    of rental for use solely as props for a motion picture, 23    television, or video production or entertainment event.24    (g-12) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules to 25implement this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 26Rules adopted to implement this amendatory Act of the 104th   SB2652- 30 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1General Assembly are exempt from the Illinois Administrative 2Procedure Act. 3    (h) An information or indictment based upon a violation of 4any subsection of this Article need not negate negative any 5exemptions contained in this Article. The defendant shall have 6the burden of proving such an exemption.7    (i) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 8affect the transportation, carrying, or possession, of any 9pistol or revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm 10consigned to a common carrier operating under license of the 11State of Illinois or the federal government, where such 12transportation, carrying, or possession is incident to the 13lawful transportation in which such common carrier is engaged; 14and nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 15affect the transportation, carrying, or possession of any 16pistol, revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm, not the 17subject of and regulated by subsection 24-1(a)(7) or 18subsection 24-2(c) of this Article, which is unloaded and 19enclosed in a case, firearm carrying box, shipping box, or 20other container, by the possessor of a valid Firearm Owners 21Identification Card.22(Source: P.A. 102-152, eff. 1-1-22; 102-779, eff. 1-1-23; 23102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 247-22-24.) 25    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are   SB2652- 31 -LRB104 13048 RLC 25507 b1severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.